California statutes. Vehicle Code
(A) A two-axle vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, including when the vehicle is towing a trailer or semitrailer with a gross vehicle
 weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a trailer coach not exceeding 9,000 pounds gross.

(C) A house car of 40 feet in length or less.

(D) A three-axle vehicle weighing 6,000 pounds gross or less.

(E) A house car of 40 feet in length or less or a vehicle towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less, including when a tow dolly is used. A person driving a vehicle may not tow another vehicle in violation of Section 21715.

(F) (i) A two-axle vehicle when towing a trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not
 exceeding 15,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight, if all of the following conditions are met:

(I) The towing of the trailer is not for compensation or commercial purposes.

(II) The trailer is coupled to the towing vehicle by a bed-mounted gooseneck hitch or a fifth-wheel and kingpin connection.

(III) The trailer is used exclusively for recreational purposes.

(IV) The trailer is used for the transportation of property or human habitation, or both.

(V) The person has passed a specialized written examination provided by the department relating to the knowledge of this code and other safety aspects governing the towing of recreational vehicles upon the highway.

(ii) A vehicle towing a fifth-wheel travel trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not exceeding 15,000 pounds, gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation, and if the person has passed a specialized written examination provided by the department relating to the knowledge of this code and other safety aspects governing the towing of recreational vehicles upon the highway.

(iii) The authority to operate combinations of vehicles under this subparagraph may be granted by endorsement on a class C license upon completion of that written examination.

(G) A vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross combination weight rating or a gross vehicle weight rating, as those terms are defined in subdivisions (j) and (k), respectively, of Section 15210, of 26,000 pounds
 or less, if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) Is operated by a farmer, an employee of a farmer, or an instructor credentialed in agriculture as part of an instructional program in agriculture at the high school, community college, or university level.

(ii) Is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations.

(iii) Is not used in the capacity of a for-hire carrier or for compensation.

(H) Firefighting equipment, provided that the equipment is operated by a person who holds a firefighter endorsement pursuant to Section 12804.11.

(I) A motorized scooter.

(J) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross
 vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, except a trailer bus.

(K) Class C does not include a two-wheel motorcycle or a two-wheel motor-driven cycle.

(4) Class M1. A two-wheel motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle. Authority to operate a vehicle included in a class M1 license may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination.

(5) (A) Class M2 includes a motorized bicycle or moped, or a bicycle with an attached motor, except an electric bicycle as described in subdivision (a) of Section 312.5.

(B) Authority to operate vehicles included in class M2 may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination. Persons holding a class M1
 license or endorsement may operate vehicles included in class M2 without further examination.

(c) A driver’s license or driver certificate is not valid for operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, any other motor vehicle listed in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), or any other vehicle requiring a driver to hold any driver certificate or any driver’s license endorsement under Section 15275, unless a medical certificate approved by the department that has been issued within two years of the date of the operation of that vehicle and a copy of the medical examination report from which the certificate was issued is on file with the department. Otherwise, the license is valid only for operating class C
 vehicles that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, and for operating class M1 or M2 vehicles, if so endorsed, that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.

(d) A license or driver certificate issued before the enactment of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15200) is valid to operate the class or type of vehicles specified under the law in existence before that enactment until the license or certificate expires or is otherwise suspended, revoked, or canceled. Upon application for renewal or replacement of a driver’s license, endorsement, or certificate required to operate a commercial motor vehicle, a valid medical certificate on a form approved by the department shall be submitted to the department.

(e) The department may accept a certificate of driving skill that is issued by an employer, authorized by
 the department to issue a certificate under Section 15250, of the applicant, in lieu of a driving test, on class A or B applications, if the applicant has first qualified for a class C license and has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The certificate may be submitted as evidence of the applicant’s skill in the operation of the types of equipment covered by the license for which the applicant is applying.

(f) The department may accept a certificate of competence in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, when the certificate is issued by a law enforcement agency for its officers who operate class M1 or M2 vehicles in their duties, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying.

(g) The department may accept a certificate of satisfactory
 completion of a motorcyclist training program approved by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2932 in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The department shall review and approve the written and driving test used by a program to determine whether the program may issue a certificate of completion.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person holding a valid California driver’s license of any class may operate a short-term rental motorized bicycle without taking any special examination for the operation of a motorized bicycle, and without having a class M2 endorsement on that license. As used in this subdivision, “short-term” means 48 hours or less.

(i) A person under 21 years of age shall not be issued a class M1 or M2 license or endorsement unless
 the person provides evidence satisfactory to the department of completion of a novice motorcycle safety training program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.

(j) A driver of a vanpool vehicle may operate with a class C license but shall possess evidence of a medical examination required for a class B license when operating vanpool vehicles. In order to be eligible to drive the vanpool vehicle, the driver shall keep in the vanpool vehicle a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the driver has not been convicted of reckless driving, drunk driving, or a hit-and-run offense in the last five years.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2029.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 610, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 16, Sec. 4.   (SB 128)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.10.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person issued a class C license under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12804.9 may drive any house car of 40 feet in length or less without obtaining a noncommercial class B driver’s license with house car endorsement as described in subdivision (b).

(b) Any person seeking to drive any house car over 40 feet in length, excluding safety devices and safety
 bumpers, shall obtain a noncommercial class B driver’s license with house car endorsement as described in this subdivision. The applicant for that endorsement shall pass a specialized written examination and demonstrate the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in operating that vehicle by driving it under the supervision of an examining officer. Upon satisfactory completion of the examination and demonstration, the applicant shall be issued a noncommercial class B driver’s license with house car endorsement by the department. Upon application for an endorsement to operate this vehicle, and every two years thereafter, the applicant shall submit medical information on a form approved by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 658, Sec. 3.   Effective October 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.11.

(a) To operate firefighting equipment, a driver, including a tiller operator, is required to do either of the following:

(1) Obtain and maintain a firefighter endorsement issued by the department and obtain and maintain a class C license as described in Section 12804.9, a restricted class A license as described in Section 12804.12, or a
 noncommercial class B license as described in Section 12804.10.

(2) Obtain and maintain a class A or B license as described in Section 12804.9 and, as appropriate, for the size and configuration of the firefighting equipment operated.

(b) To qualify for a firefighter endorsement the driver shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Provide to the department proof of current employment as a firefighter or registration as a volunteer firefighter with a fire department and evidence of fire equipment operation training by providing a letter or other indication from the chief of the fire department or his or her designee.

(B) For purposes of this section, evidence of fire equipment operation training means the applicant has successfully
 completed Fire Apparatus Driver/Operator 1A taught by an instructor registered with the Office of the State Fire Marshal or fire department driver training that meets all of the following requirements:

(i) Meets or exceeds the standards outlined in NFPA 1002, Chapter 4 (2008 version) or the Fire Apparatus Driver/Operator 1A course adopted by the Office of the State Fire Marshal.

(ii) Prepares the applicant to safely operate the department’s fire equipment that the applicant will be authorized to operate.

(iii) Includes a classroom (cognitive) portion of at least 16 hours.

(iv) Includes a manipulative portion of at least 14 hours, which includes directly supervised behind-the-wheel driver training.

(C) Driver training shall be conducted by a person who is registered with the Office of the State Fire Marshal to instruct a Fire Apparatus Driver/Operator 1A course or a person who meets all of the following criteria:

(i) Possesses a minimum of five years of fire service experience as an emergency vehicle operator, three of which must be at the rank of engineer or higher.

(ii) Possesses a valid California class A or B license or a class A or B license restricted to the operation of firefighting equipment or a class C license with a firefighter endorsement.

(iii) Is certified as a qualified training instructor or training officer by the State of California, the federal government, or a county training officers’ association.

(2) Pass the
 written firefighter examination developed by the department with the cooperation of the Office of the State Fire Marshal.

(3) Upon application and every two years thereafter, submit medical information on a form approved by the department.

(c) There shall be no additional charge for adding a firefighter endorsement to an original license or when renewing a license. To add a firefighter endorsement to an existing license when not renewing the license, the applicant shall pay the fee for a duplicate license pursuant to Section 14901.

(d) (1) A driver of firefighting equipment is subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) if both of the following conditions exist:

(A) The equipment is operated by a person employed as a firefighter
 by a federal or state agency, by a regularly organized fire department of a city, county, city and county, or district, or by a tribal fire department or registered as a volunteer member of a regularly organized fire department having official recognition of the city, county, city and county, or district in which the department is located, or of a tribal fire department.

(B) The motor vehicle is used to travel to and from the scene of an emergency situation, or to transport equipment used in the control of an emergency situation, and which is owned, leased, or rented by, or under the exclusive control of, a federal or state agency, a regularly organized fire department of a city, county, city and county, or district, a volunteer fire department having official recognition of the city, county, city and county, or district in which the department is located, or a tribal fire department.

(2) A driver of firefighting equipment is not required to obtain and maintain a firefighter endorsement pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) if the driver is operating the firefighting equipment for training purposes, during a nonemergency, while under the direct supervision of a fire department employee who is properly licensed to operate the equipment and is authorized by the fire department to provide training.

(e) For purposes of this section, a tiller operator is the driver of the rear free-axle portion of a ladder truck.

(f) For purposes of this section, “firefighting equipment” means a motor vehicle, that meets the definition of a class A or class B vehicle described in subdivision (b) of Section 12804.9, that is used to travel to and from the scene of an emergency situation, or to transport equipment used in the control of an emergency situation, and
 that is owned, leased, or rented by, or under the exclusive control of, a federal or state agency, a regularly organized fire department of a city, county, city and county, or district, or a volunteer fire department having official recognition of the city, county, city and county, or district in which the department is located.

(g) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a regularly organized fire department, having official recognition of the city, county, city and county, or district in which the department is located, may require an employee or a volunteer of the fire department who is a driver or operator of firefighting equipment to hold a class A or B license.

(h) This section applies to a person hired by a fire department, or to a person renewing a driver’s license, on or after January 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (AB 2438)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.12.

(a) The department may issue a restricted class A driver’s license for the operation of any two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a trailer coach exceeding 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating, or a fifth-wheel travel trailer exceeding 15,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation.

(b) In lieu of a report of a medical examination required by Section 12804.9, an applicant for a restricted license issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall, upon application and every two years thereafter, submit medical information on a form approved by the department.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 610, Sec. 3.   (SB 287)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 610.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.12.

(a) The department may issue a restricted class A driver’s license for the operation of a vehicle towing a trailer if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The towing of the trailer is not for compensation or commercial purposes.

(2) The trailer has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds.

(3) The trailer is used exclusively for recreational purposes.

(4) The trailer is used for the transportation of property or human habitation, or
 both.

(b) In lieu of a report of a medical examination required by Section 12804.9, an applicant for a restricted license issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall, upon application and every two years thereafter, submit medical information on a form approved by the department.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 610, Sec. 4.   (SB 287)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.14.

(a) The department may issue a restricted class A driver’s license for the operation of any two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a livestock trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not exceeding 15,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The vehicle is controlled and operated by a farmer.

(2) The vehicle is used to transport livestock to or from a farm.

(3) The vehicle is not used in the operations of a common or contract carrier.

(4) The vehicle is used within 150 miles of the person’s farm.

(b) The requirements of subdivision (a) incorporate the guidelines published by the Federal Highway Administration in the Federal Register on September 26, 1988 (53 FR 37313). The department shall follow those guidelines in acting pursuant to this section as those guidelines now exist and as they are hereafter amended.

(c) In lieu of a report of a medical examination required by Sections 12804 and 12804.9, a licensed California driver applying for a restricted license issued pursuant to
 subdivision (a) shall, upon application and every two years thereafter, submit medical information on a form approved by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 10, Sec. 14.   Effective February 9, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.15.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 362, for purposes of this section “house car” means a vehicle described in subdivision (b) of Section 12804.10.

(b) (1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), no person may operate a house car unless that person has in his or her possession a valid driver’s license of the appropriate class and an endorsement thereto issued by the department to permit operation of the
 house car.

(2) A nonresident may not operate a house car in this state unless that person is in possession of an out-of-state driver’s license authorizing the operation of that vehicle.

(c) An endorsement to drive a house car may be issued only if the applicant meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The applicant successfully completes an examination prescribed by the department to determine qualification for the endorsement.

(2) Upon initial application and every two years thereafter, the applicant submits medical information on a form approved by the department to verify that the person meets the minimum medical requirements established by the department for operation of a house car.

(3) Upon application for issuance of an original driver’s license or renewal driver’s license pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12804.10, there shall be paid to the department a fee of thirty-four dollars ($34) for a license that will expire on the applicant’s fifth birthday following the date of the application.

(d) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke an endorsement to drive a house car when the applicant does not meet any requirement for the issuance or retention of the endorsement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 658, Sec. 4.   Effective October 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12805.

(a) The department shall not issue a driver’s license to, or renew a driver’s license of, any person:

(1) Who is not of legal age to receive a driver’s license.

(2) Whose best corrected visual acuity is 20/200 or worse in that person’s better eye, as verified by an optometrist or ophthalmologist. A person shall not use a bioptic telescopic or similar lens to meet the 20/200 visual acuity standards.

(3) Who is unable, as shown by examination, to understand traffic signs or signals or who does not
 have a reasonable knowledge of the requirements of this code governing the operation of vehicles upon the highways.

(4) When it is determined, by examination or other evidence, that the person is unable to safely operate a motor vehicle upon a highway.

(5) Who is unable to read and understand English used in highway traffic and directional signs.

(6) Who holds a valid driver’s license issued by a foreign jurisdiction unless the license has been surrendered to the department, or is lost or destroyed.

(7) Who has ever held, or is the holder of, a license to drive issued by another state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and that license has been suspended by reason, in whole or in
 part, of a conviction of a traffic violation until the suspension period has terminated, except that the department may issue a license to the applicant if, in the opinion of the department, it will be safe to issue a license to a person whose license to drive was suspended by a state that is not a party to the Driver License Compact provided for in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 6.

(8) Who has ever held, or is the holder of, a license to drive issued by another state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and that license has been revoked by reason, in whole or in part, of a conviction of a traffic violation, until the revocation has been terminated or after the expiration of one year from the date the license was revoked, whichever occurs first, except that the department may issue a license to the applicant if, in the opinion of the department, it
 will be safe to issue a license to a person whose license to drive was revoked by a state that is not a party to the Driver License Compact provided for in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 6.

(b) The department shall not issue a Real ID driver’s license to a person who holds a valid Real ID identification card.

(c) The department may cancel a driver’s license in order to enable compliance with subdivision (b).

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 339, Sec. 10.   (SB 838)   Effective September 13, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12806.

The department may refuse to issue to, or renew a driver’s license of, any person:

(a) Who is rendered incapable of safely operating a motor vehicle because of alcoholism, excessive and chronic use of alcoholic beverages, or addiction to, or habitual use of, any drug.

(b) Who is addicted to the use of narcotic drugs unless the person is participating in a narcotic treatment
 program approved pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 11875) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, in which case the person may be issued a probationary license, subject to reasonable terms and conditions, if that drug usage does not affect the person’s ability to exercise reasonable and ordinary control in operating a motor vehicle on the highway.

(c) Who has a disorder characterized by lapses of consciousness or who has experienced, within the last three years, either a lapse of consciousness or an episode of marked confusion caused by any condition which may bring about recurrent lapses, or who has any physical or mental disability, disease, or disorder which could affect the safe operation of a motor vehicle unless the department has medical information which indicates the person may safely operate a motor vehicle. In making its determination, the department may rely on any relevant information
 available to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 455, Ch. 30.   Effective September 5, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12806.5.

The department may adopt regulations specifying, in addition to any cause provided by statute, the circumstances which are grounds for the suspension or revocation of a schoolbus, school pupil activity, youth busdriver, farm labor vehicle, or general public paratransit vehicle certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1360, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

12807.

The department shall not issue or renew a driver’s license to any person:

(a) When a license previously issued to the person under this code has been suspended until the expiration of the period of the suspension, unless cause for suspension has been removed.

(b) When a license previously issued to the person under this code has been revoked until the expiration of one year after the date of the revocation, except where a different period of revocation is prescribed by this code, or unless the cause for revocation has been removed.

(c) When
 the department has received a notice pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5, unless the department has received a certificate as provided in those sections.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 8.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 800.)
-------------------------------------------

12807.

The department shall not issue or renew a driver’s license to any person:

(a) When a license previously issued to the person under this code has been suspended until the expiration of the period of the suspension, unless cause for suspension has been removed.

(b) When a license previously issued to the person under this code has been revoked until the expiration of one year after the date of the revocation, except where a different period of revocation is prescribed by this code, or unless the cause for revocation has been removed.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 9.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12808.

(a) The department shall, before issuing or renewing any license, check the record of the applicant for conviction of traffic violations and traffic accidents.

(b) The department shall, before issuing or renewing any license, check the record of the applicant for notices of failure to appear in court filed with it and shall withhold or shall not issue a license to any applicant who has violated their written promise to appear in court unless the department has received a certificate issued by the magistrate or clerk of the court hearing the case in which the promise was given showing that the case has been adjudicated or unless the applicant’s record
 is cleared as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 41500) of Division 17. In lieu of the certificate of adjudication, a notice from the court stating that the original records have been lost or destroyed shall permit the department to issue a license.

(c) (1) Any notice received by the department pursuant to former Section 40509, Section 40509.1, or former Section 40509.5, except subdivision (c) of former Section 40509.5, that has been on file five years may be removed from the department records and destroyed at the discretion of the department.

(2) Any notice received by the department under subdivision (c) of former Section 40509.5 that has been on file 10 years may be removed from the department records and destroyed at the discretion of the department.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 10.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 11 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 800.)
-------------------------------------------

12808.

(a) The department shall, before issuing or renewing any license, check the record of the applicant for conviction of traffic violations and traffic accidents.

(b) (1) Any notice received by the department pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5, except subdivision (c) of former Section 40509.5,
 shall be removed from the department records.

(2) Any notice received by the department pursuant to Section 40509.1, that has been on file five years may be removed from the department records and destroyed at the discretion of the department.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 11.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12809.

The department may refuse to issue or renew a driver’s license to any person:

(a) If the department is satisfied that the applicant is not entitled to the license under this code.

(b) If the applicant has failed to furnish the department the information required in the application or reasonable additional information requested by the department.

(c) If the department determines that the applicant has made or permitted unlawful use of any driver’s license.

(d) If the department determines that the person has knowingly used a false or fictitious name in any application for a license or has impersonated another in making application or in taking any test, or has knowingly made a false statement or knowingly concealed a material fact, or otherwise committed any fraud in any application.

(e) If the department determines that the applicant is a negligent or incompetent operator of a motor vehicle.

(f) If the applicant is convicted of any offense involving the transportation for purpose of sale, or the transportation for compensation, of a controlled substance under Division 10 (commencing with Section
 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, and the commission of the offense involved the use or operation of a motor vehicle.

If, however, the driving privilege of the applicant is on probation for a cause related to the use or possession of a narcotic controlled substance, the department may refuse to issue or renew a driver’s license to the applicant if the applicant is subsequently convicted of any offense involving the use or possession of a narcotic controlled substance, whether or not the commission of the offense involved the use or operation of a motor vehicle.

The maximum period of time for which the department may refuse to issue or renew a driver’s license to any person pursuant to this subdivision shall be three years from the date of conviction.

(g) If the applicant fails or refuses to surrender to the department, upon its lawful demand, a nonresident
 minor’s certificate which has been canceled.

(h) If the applicant has failed to appear regarding a citation issued for vehicle abandonment as specified in Section 22523.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1989.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1267, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1988.   Section operative July 1, 1989, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12810.

In determining the violation point count, the following shall apply:

(a) A conviction of failure to stop in the event of an accident in violation of Section 20001 or 20002 shall be given a value of two points.

(b) A conviction of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 shall be given a value of two
 points.

(c) A conviction of reckless driving shall be given a value of two points.

(d) (1) A conviction of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 or subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, or of Section 2800.2 or 2800.3, subdivision (b) of Section 21651, subdivision (b) of Section 22348, subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 23109, Section 23109.1, or Section 31602 of this code, shall be given a value of two points.

(2) A conviction of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 23140 shall be given a value of two points.

(e) A conviction of a violation of Section 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, 14601.3, or 14601.5 shall be given a value of two points.

(f) Except as provided in subdivision (i), any other traffic conviction involving the safe operation of a motor vehicle upon the highway shall be given a value of one point.

(g) A traffic accident in which the operator is deemed by the department to be responsible shall be given a value of one point.

(h) A conviction of a violation of Section 27360 or 27360.5 shall be given a value of one point.

(i) (1) A violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 40001 shall not result in a violation point count being given to the driver if the driver is not the owner of the vehicle.

(2) A conviction of a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 12814.6, subdivision (a) of Section
 21116, Section 21207.5, 21708, 21710, 21716, 23120, 24800, or 26707 shall not be given a violation point count.

(3) A violation of subdivision (d) of Section 21712 shall not result in a violation point count.

(4) A violation of Section 23136 shall not result in a violation point count.

(5) A violation of Section 38301, 38301.3, 38301.5, 38304.1, or 38504.1 shall not result in a violation point count.

(j) A conviction for only one violation arising from one occasion of arrest or citation shall be counted in determining the violation point count for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 414, Sec. 2.   (AB 134)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12810.2.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 12810, a violation point count shall not be given for a conviction of a violation of Section 27315, 27318, or 27319.

(b) The amendments to this section as added by the act that added this subdivision shall be operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 20)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Amended version operative July 1, 2018, by Stats. 2017, Ch. 593, Sec. 5, and as restated in its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12810.3.

Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 12810, a violation point shall be given only for a conviction of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 23123, subdivision (a) of Section 23123.5, or subdivision (b) of Section 23124, occurring on or after July 1, 2021, that occurs within 36 months of a prior conviction for the same offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   (AB 47)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

12810.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no violation point shall be given for a conviction of a violation of Section 22526.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12810.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a person whose driving record shows a violation point count of four or more points in 12 months, six or more points in 24 months, or eight or more points in 36 months shall be prima facie presumed to be a negligent operator of a motor vehicle. In applying this subdivision to a driver, if the person requests and appears at a hearing conducted by the department, the department shall give due consideration to the amount of use or
 mileage traveled in the operation of a motor vehicle.

(b) (1) A class A or class B licensed driver, except persons holding certificates pursuant to Section 12517, 12519, 12523, 12523.5, or 12527, or an endorsement issued pursuant to paragraph (2) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 15278, who is presumed to be a negligent operator pursuant to subdivision (a), and who requests and appears at a hearing and is found to have a driving record violation point count of six or more points in 12 months, eight or more points in 24 months, or 10 or more points in 36 months is presumed to be a prima facie negligent operator. However, the higher point count does not apply if the department reasonably determines that four or more points in 12 months, six or more points in 24 months, or eight or more points in 36 months are attributable to the driver’s operation of a vehicle requiring only a class C license, and not requiring a
 certificate or endorsement, or a class M license.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, each point assigned pursuant to Section 12810 shall be valued at one and one-half times the value otherwise required by that section for each violation reasonably determined by the department to be attributable to the driver’s operation of a vehicle requiring a class A or class B license, or requiring a certificate or endorsement described in this section.

(c) The department may require a negligent operator whose driving privilege is suspended or revoked pursuant to this section to submit proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430, on or before the date of reinstatement following the suspension or revocation. The proof of financial responsibility shall be maintained with the department for three years following that date of reinstatement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 630, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12811.

(a) (1) (A) When the department determines that the applicant is lawfully entitled to a license, it shall issue to the person a driver’s license as applied for. The license shall state the class of license for which the licensee has qualified and shall contain the distinguishing number assigned to the applicant, the date of expiration, the true full name, age, and mailing address or residence address of the licensee, a brief description and engraved picture or photograph of the licensee for the purpose of identification, and space for the signature of the licensee.

(B) Each license shall also contain a space for the endorsement of a record of each suspension or revocation of the license.

(C) The department shall use whatever process or processes, in the issuance of engraved or colored licenses, that prohibit, as near as possible, the ability to alter or reproduce the license or prohibit the ability to superimpose a picture or photograph on the license without ready detection.

(2) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (1), a license issued to a person under 18 years of age shall display the words “provisional until age 18.”
